Washington statutes.
RCW 19.230.240

Suspension and revocation of authorized delegates.

(1) The director may issue an order to suspend, revoke, or condition the designation of an authorized delegate, impose civil penalties, require payment of restitution to damaged parties, require affirmative actions as are necessary to comply with this chapter or the rules adopted under this chapter, or remove from office or prohibit from participation in the affairs of the authorized delegate or licensee, or both, any executive officer, person in control, or employee of the authorized delegate if the director finds that:

(a) The authorized delegate violated this chapter or a rule adopted or an order issued under this chapter;

(b) The authorized delegate does not cooperate with an examination, investigation, or subpoena lawfully issued by the director or the director's designee;

(c) The authorized delegate engaged in fraud, intentional misrepresentation, or gross negligence;

(d) The authorized delegate is convicted of a violation of a state or federal money laundering or terrorism statute;

(e) The competence, experience, character, or general fitness of the authorized delegate or a person in control of the authorized delegate indicates that it is not in the public interest to permit the authorized delegate to provide money services;

(f) The authorized delegate engaged in or is engaging in an unsafe or unsound practice, or unfair and deceptive act or practice; or

(g) The authorized delegate, or any of its executive officers or other persons in control of the authorized delegate, are listed or become listed on the specially designated nationals and blocked persons list prepared by the United States department of the treasury as a potential threat to commit terrorist acts or to finance terrorist acts.

(2) In determining whether an authorized delegate is engaging in an unsafe or unsound practice, the director may consider the size and condition of the authorized delegate's provision of money services, the magnitude of the loss or potential loss to consumers or others, the gravity of the violation of this chapter or a rule adopted or order issued under this chapter, any action against the authorized delegate taken by another state or the federal government, and the previous conduct of the authorized delegate.

[ 2003 c 287 s 26.]